Tennessee, session 114, SB0558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-2-224, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The fish and wildlife commission may promulgate rules and regulations
establishing procedures and guidelines for the operation of wildlife resources agency
sport shooting ranges and establishing fees for use by the general public. The wildlife
resources agency may contract for the operation and maintenance of the facilities.
Moneys derived from the fees must be deposited in the wildlife resources fund.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0558
001338
- 1 -